Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4739.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; GEOTHERMAL ENERGY SYSTEM; THE HEIGHTS COMMUNITY ENERGY.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, paragraph (j), $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the renewable development account established in Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, to the commissioner of commerce for a grant to The Heights Community Energy to construct a geothermal energy system. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section, "geothermal energy system" means a system composed of one or more heat pumps connected to piping embedded in the earth that exchanges thermal energy with the earth and associated distribution and building mechanical infrastructure to provide heating and cooling to one or more buildings. new text end